North Carolina, session 2025, HB510.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-164.3 is amended by adding two new subdivisions to read:
"(88) Feminine hygiene products. – Tampons, panty liners, menstrual cups, sanitary
napkins, and other similar tangible personal property designed for feminine
hygiene in connection with the human menstrual cycle but does not include
"grooming and hygiene products."
…
(94) Grooming and hygiene products. – Soaps and cleaning solutions, shampoo,
toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and sun tan lotions and screens,
regardless of whether the items meet the definition of "over-the-counter
drugs.""
SECTION 2. G.S. 105-164.13 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(76) Feminine hygiene products."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the recurring sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used for the Feminine Hygiene Products Grant
Program established pursuant to G.S. 115C-377.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025. Sections 1 and 2 of this act
apply to sales made on or after that date.
*H510-v-1*